Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.050

"Erotic material"—Definitions.

For the purposes of RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120:

(1) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years;

(2) "Erotic material" means printed material, photographs, pictures, motion pictures, sound recordings, and other material the dominant theme of which taken as a whole appeals to the prurient interest of minors in sex; which is patently offensive because it affronts contemporary community standards relating to the description or representation of sexual matters or sado-masochistic abuse; and is utterly without redeeming social value;

(3) "Person" means any individual, corporation, or other organization;

(4) "Dealers", "distributors", and "exhibitors" mean persons engaged in the distribution, sale, or exhibition of printed material, photographs, pictures, motion pictures, or sound recordings.

[ 1992 c 5 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 13.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: As to the constitutionality of this section, see Soundgarden v. Eikenberry, 123 Wn.2d 750, 871 P.2d 1050 (1994).

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 256: "If any provision of this 1969 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provisions to other persons or circumstances, is not affected." [ 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 21.]